Louisiana, session 2026, SB177.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1261, 1281, 1282, 1283(A), 1284(A), 1285, 1288(A), 1289,
1289.1, and 1292(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1261. Renewal of policy; increase in premiums prohibited
A. Any An insurance policy terminating by it's the policy's terms at a
specified expiration date and not otherwise renewable may be renewed or extended
at the option of the insurer. Such The renewal shall be made upon a currently
authorized renewal form and at the premium rate then required for a specific
additional period or periods by a certificate or by endorsement of the policy, and
without requiring the issuance of a new policy.
B. No An insurer shall not increase the premium charged for an automobile
liability insurance policy at the time of renewal for any insured solely on the grounds
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-253 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 177
that the insured's policy has lapsed if the policy is renewed within ten days after the
date of termination.
* * *
§1281. Standard automobile insurance form
The commissioner of insurance may promulgate such any rules and
regulations as necessary to establish reasonable standard provisions to be included
in all policies of automobile insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state.
All such policies shall be written in language that can be easily understood by most
automobile insurance consumers.
§1282. Standard motor vehicle insurance form; prohibited provisions
No A motor vehicle liability insurance policy nor any or uninsured motorist
coverage for bodily injury shall not limit the coverage of, or the amount that can be
recovered by, the named insured, or the spouse or other family member of the named
insured, or express or implied permissive users, for whom the policy provides
coverage, to any amount less than the highest policy limit provided in the policy for
the respective coverage or potential recovery. Any recovery is limited to damages
actually sustained. Any provision of a motor vehicle insurance policy issued in, or
for delivery in, the state of Louisiana that is not in accord with this Section is
contrary to the public policy of this state and shall be null, void, and unenforceable.
§1283. Proof of motorcycle endorsement
A. Each person who makes an application for issuance of a policy of
insurance covering a motorcycle shall provide proof of the appropriate license
endorsement required by R.S. 32:408(C). Such The proof shall be provided to the
insurer or its producer within ninety days of application for such policy. If the policy
of insurance is issued by an insurer that does not maintain an office in this state, then
the person may submit a sworn affidavit that he has the proper license endorsement
to the insurer.
* * *
§1284. Motor vehicle insurance; consideration of nonfault incidents prohibited
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-253 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 177
A. No An insurer shall not increase the rate, increase or add a surcharge,
cancel, or fail to renew any policy of motor vehicle insurance when such action is
based on consideration of one or more nonfault incidents.
* * *
§1285. Automobile insurance policies; refusal to issue or renew; age discrimination
No An insurer shall not refuse to issue or renew an automobile insurance
policy to any person over the age of sixty-five based upon the age of the insured
provided the insured is mentally and physically capable of driving an automobile and
possesses a valid Louisiana operator's license issued by the office of motor vehicles
of the Louisiana Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
§1288. Discrimination in automobile liability insurance prohibited
A. No An insurer shall not refuse to issue or renew, increase the premium,
or cancel an automobile insurance policy solely because the insured is deaf or hard
of hearing, provided such the person is mentally and physically capable of driving
an automobile and possesses a valid Louisiana operator's license issued by the office
of motor vehicles of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
§1289. Automobile policies; discrimination against paid or volunteer firemen
prohibited
No An insurer doing business in this state who issues a personal automobile
insurance policy to an insured who is a paid or volunteer fireman shall not charge
a higher premium rate, increase or add a surcharge, cancel, or fail to renew a policy
for the insured, based solely on the insured's activities as a paid or volunteer fireman.
§1289.1. Automobile insurance policies; policy issuance based upon impending
weather conditions
No An insurer shall not refuse to issue an automobile insurance policy
providing collision or comprehensive coverage on a newly purchased motor vehicle,
at the time of purchase of the automobile from a duly licensed motor vehicle dealer,
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-253 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 177
to one of the insurer's existing automobile policyholders who is an otherwise
qualified purchaser, based solely upon a named tropical storm or hurricane in the
Gulf of America.
* * *
§1292. Towing and storage of motor vehicles; insurance policies; storage fees;
exceptions
A. A motor vehicle insurance policy shall not be construed to allow an
insurer to assume or accede to the legal title of a motor vehicle without assuming
credit obligations of the insured owner of the motor vehicle for charges for towing
and storage services associated with the incident from which the insurance coverage
arises. Such The charges for storage services shall not exceed any maximum charge
set by the Public Service Commission pursuant to its legal authority under R.S.
45:180.1, or as otherwise provided by law.
B. An insurer which has succeeded to the title of a motor vehicle is shall not
authorized to abandon such the vehicle to a towing or storage service without
consent of the provider of such service.
* * *